Missouri, session 2026, HB2580.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.172, to read as follows:
167.172. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Biological sex", as defined in section 191.1720;
(2) "Gender transition", as defined in section 191.1720;
(3) "Parent", a parent, legal guardian, or other person having charge, control,
or custody of a student;
(4) "Public school", as defined in section 160.011;
(5) "Social transition", encouraging or participating with a minor student in
changing his or her presentation or expression, including, but not limited to, details such
as his or her name, appearance, or behavior, with the goal of such minor student being
perceived and treated as a member of the opposite biological sex to such student's own
biological sex, or with the goal of such minor student not being perceived and treated as
a member of such student's own biological sex, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(a) The use of alternative pronouns or names for the minor student, either in
school records or otherwise; and
(b) The minor student's use of sex-segregated privacy facilities or participation
in sex-differentiated school-sponsored activities;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2580 2
(6) "Staff member", a teacher, school employee, volunteer, contractor, or other
individual authorized to provide services at a public school, including, but not limited to,
any individual in a position of authority or responsibility, such as a counselor or health
care worker.
2. Each staff member shall inform the public school principal or such principal's
designee, as soon as practicable but in any event within twenty-four hours, of a request
from a minor student that such staff member participate in or support the social
transition of such student. Each public school principal or such principal's designee
shall, as soon as practicable but in any event within seventy-two hours of the initial
conversation or request involving the student, inform all parents of such student that the
student has requested that a staff member participate in or support the social transition
of such student.
3. No staff member of any public school shall:
(1) Participate in, support, or engage in any conduct that facilitates the social
transition of any minor student, including any counseling of a minor student at school
that affirms such student's self-identification as a biological sex other than such
student's actual biological sex; or
(2) Initiate a conversation with, or deliver any presentation or lesson to, any
minor student regarding gender transition.
4. Any public school employee who discloses a violation of this section by a
school official shall be protected from any manner of retaliation as set forth in section
105.055.
5. If a school district discovers that a staff member who holds a certificate of
license to teach has knowingly violated any provision of this section, the school district
shall initiate proceedings seeking to terminate the employment of that staff member and
to suspend or revoke such license, as applicable, based upon evidence of incompetence,
immorality, or neglect of duty, pursuant to the provisions of section 168.071.
6. The attorney general may bring a civil action, including an action for
injunctive relief, against a school district or school for any violation of this section. Such
action shall be brought in the county where the violation occurred.
7. Any parent of a minor student may bring a civil action, including an action for
injunctive relief or for damages, against the school district or public school in which
such minor student is enrolled for any violation of this section. Such action shall be
brought in the county where the violation occurred. If the parent prevails, the court

HB 2580 3
shall award to such parent court costs and reasonable attorney's fees and any other
damages or remedy which in the judgment of the court shall be appropriate.
✔